Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.025

Agency created—Appointment of director—Director's duties.

(1) There is created Washington technology solutions, an agency of state government. The agency shall be headed by a director, who is the state chief information officer. The director shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate. The director shall serve at the governor's pleasure and shall receive such salary as determined by the governor. If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not in session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting of the senate at which time he or she shall present to that body his or her nomination for the position.

(2) The director shall:

(a) Appoint a confidential secretary and such deputy and assistant directors as needed to administer the agency;

(b) Appoint such professional, technical, and clerical assistants and employees as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed by this chapter in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided by law; and

(c) Establish standards and policies to govern information technology in the state of Washington.

(3) The director may create such administrative structures as he or she deems appropriate and may delegate any power or duty vested in him or her by this chapter or other law.

(4) The director shall exercise all the powers and perform all the duties prescribed by law with respect to the administration of this chapter including:

(a) Reporting to the governor any matters relating to abuses and evasions of this chapter;

(b) Accepting and expending gifts and grants that are related to the purposes of this chapter;

(c) Applying for grants from public and private entities, and receiving and administering any grant funding received for the purpose and intent of this chapter; and

(d) Performing other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

[ 2024 c 54 s 4; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 103; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 803; 1999 c 80 s 5; 1992 c 20 s 9; 1987 c 504 s 6. Formerly RCW 43.105.047.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Severability—1992 c 20: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1992 c 20 s 14.]

Captions not law—1992 c 20: "Captions used in this act do not constitute any part of the law." [ 1992 c 20 s 16.]

Civil service exemptions: RCW 41.06.094.